Utah statutes.
53A-3-202.   Compensation for services -- Additional per diem -- Approval of expenses.

(1)  Each member of a local school board, except the student member, shall receive compensation for services and for necessary expenses in accordance with board compensation schedules adopted by the local school board in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(2)  Beginning on July 1, 2007, if a local school board decides to adopt or amend its board compensation schedules, the board shall set a time and place for a public hearing at which all interested persons shall be given an opportunity to be heard.

(3)  Notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting shall be provided at least seven days prior to the meeting by:

(a) (i)  publication at least once in a newspaper published in the county where the school district is situated and generally circulated within the school district; and

(ii)  publication on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701; and

(b)  posting a notice:

(i)  at each school within the school district;

(ii)  in at least three other public places within the school district; and

(iii)  on the Internet in a manner that is easily accessible to citizens that use the Internet.

(4)  After the conclusion of the public hearing, the local school board may adopt or amend its board compensation schedules.

(5)  Each member shall submit an itemized account of necessary travel expenses for board approval.

(6)  A local school board may, without following the procedures described in Subsections (2) and (3), continue to use the compensation schedule that was in effect prior to July 1, 2007 until, at the discretion of the board, the compensation schedule is amended or a new compensation schedule is adopted.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2010 General Session

